Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Article 2. Tuberculin Test of Dairy Cattle

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 38 to 48; 35A Am. Jur. 2d Food §§ 23, 36 to 40.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 66 to 68, 73 to 98; 36A C.J.S. Food §§ 3 to 49.

§ 11-19-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Dairy animal” means any cow, sheep or goat, the milk or milk products from which is sold or used for human consumption;

“Livestock animal” means as defined in W.S. 11-29-101(a)(vi);

“This act” means W.S.

11-19-201

through

11-19-215

.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 77, § 7; C.S. 1920, § 3799; Laws 1925, ch. 58, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 45-307; C.S. 1945, § 46-507; W.S. 1957, § 11-293; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-201; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to brucellosis test of cattle, see §

11-19-401

.

As to food safety system, see §

35-7-123

.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “Dairy animal” for “Dairy cow” and added “sheep or goat” in (i), and added the definition of “Livestock animal” in (ii), redesignating existing (ii) as (iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§§ 11-19-202 through 11-19-207.
[Repealed.]

History.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 12, § 2.

§ 11-19-208.
Ear tags; record to be kept of livestock animals tested.

Each livestock animal
tested for tuberculosis shall have an official ear tag inserted in its ear.
The
testing veterinarian shall
keep an official record of all
livestock animals tested and submit a copy of the record to state
and federal animal health officials.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 77, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3798; R.S. 1931, § 45-306; C.S. 1945, § 46-506; W.S. 1957, § 11-300; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-208; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

§ 11-19-209.
Tests of livestock animals.

Whenever the state veterinarian
suspects that tuberculosis exists or has been introduced
to livestock
animals, he shall order the
testing of
the livestock
animals.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 77, § 10; C.S. 1920, § 3802; R.S. 1931, § 45-310; C.S. 1945, § 46-510; W.S. 1957, § 11-301; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-209; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “introduced to livestock animals, he shall order the testing of the livestock animals” for “introduced by imported dairy cattle among any dairy cattle in this state, he shall order the retesting of same, regardless of any former tests made.”

§§ 11-19-210 through 11-19-213.
[Repealed.]

History.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 12, § 2.

§ 11-19-214.
Disposition of diseased livestock.

All livestock animals in Wyoming found to be affected with or exposed to tuberculosis may be
disposed on the origin premises or transported under
the direction of the state veterinarian
directly to an approved
slaughter facility, rendering facility or veterinary diagnostic laboratory in accordance with federal regulations.
Producers may be eligible for indemnification as provided in W.S.

11-19-106

for any livestock animal ordered disposed pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1929, ch. 44, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 67-901; Laws 1939, ch. 27, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 46-515; W.S. 1957, § 11-306; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-214; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2005, ch. 18, § 2; 2012, ch. 90, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

See, also, §

11-19-406

.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the section, which pertained to cattle affected by either tuberculosis or Bang’s disease.

Laws 2005, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 17, 2005.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted the present last sentence for the former last sentence, which read: “Prior to directing that any affected livestock be sold under this section, the state veterinarian shall ascertain that sufficient funds are available from either federal or state sources to ensure that the owner of condemned livestock will be paid the difference between the market value at the time of quarantine and the amount received for the sale, less any amount of reimbursement provided for and paid under federal law or regulation, the cost of shipping or transportation and commission charges.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, twice added “animals” or a variant following “livestock,” deleted “lawfully” following “Wyoming,” added “or exposed to” following “affected with,” substituted “disposed on the origin premises” for “shipped,” substituted “directly” for “in accordance with federal regulations, to livestock markets and there sold for salvage and destroyed or transferred,” added “rendering facility” following “slaughter facility,” and made a related change.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 2, ch. 44, Laws 1929, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict with that act.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Wildlife — Private Property Damage Law — Once Upon
a Time in Wyoming There was Room for Millions of Cattle and Enough
Habitat for Every Species of Game to Find a Luxurious Existence. In
the Aftermath of Parker, Can We All Still Get Along?
Parker Land and Cattle Company v. Wyoming Game and Fish Commission, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1994).

§ 11-19-215.
Prohibited acts; penalties.

Any person who intentionally
interferes with, refuses to assist in gathering and testing his
livestock animals, or hinders the work of the state
veterinarian or his employees under this act, or who attempts to defeat
the object of the tuberculin test by a previous injection of tuberculin
commonly known as “plugging,” or in any way attempts to prevent an
accurate and truthful determination of the condition of the
livestock animals tested, shall be
punished as provided in W.S.

11-1-103

.

History.

Laws 1917, ch. 77, § 14; C.S. 1920, § 3806; Laws 1925, ch. 58, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 45-314; C.S. 1945, § 46-514; W.S. 1957, § 11-307; W.S. 1977, § 11-22-215; Laws 1978, ch. 32, § 1; 2013 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, twice added “animals” or a variant following “livestock,” deleted “lawfully” following “Wyoming,” added “or exposed to” following “affected with,” substituted “disposed on the origin premises” for “shipped,” substituted “directly” for “in accordance with federal regulations, to livestock markets and there sold for salvage and destroyed or transferred,” added “rendering facility” following “slaughter facility,” and made a related change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 11-19-201(a)(iii).